Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska51-206
Library board; mortgages; release or renewal.

The president shall have the power to release, upon full payment, any mortgage constituting a credit to the library fund and standing in the name of such library board. The signature of the president on any such release shall be authenticated by the secretary of the board. The president and secretary in like manner, upon resolution duly passed and adopted by the board, may renew any such mortgage.

Laws 1925, c. 38, § 1, p. 149;

C.S.1929, § 51-204;

Laws 1941, c. 103, § 1, p. 421;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 51-204;

R.S.1943, § 51-206.